South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4607.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Military Skills to Civilian Licensure Act." SECTION 2.  (A) The General Assembly finds: (1) Veterans frequently possess highly technical, leadership, medical, logistical, and mechanical training that is equal to or exceeds civilian certification requirements. (2) Requiring veterans to start over upon reentering the workforce results in economic delay, unemployment, and preventable poverty. (3) Recognizing military training strengthens South Carolina's workforce, reduces dependency, and honors service through structure-not symbolism. (B) This act ensures veterans may convert their military training into licensed, compensated civilian employment efficiently and without unnecessary barriers. SECTION 3.  Chapter 15, Title 25 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 25-15-50.  (A)(1) Every licensing board shall accept documented military education, training, and experience as full or partial credit toward licensure when substantially equivalent. (2) If a licensure is denied, the board must issue a written explanation within thirty days. (B) Veterans and military spouses must have applications processed within twenty business days, with temporary licensure issued when examination is pending but competency is established. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----